Utah statutes.
41-6a-717.   Use of runaway vehicle ramps.

(1)  A person may not use a runaway vehicle ramp unless the person is in an emergency situation requiring the use of the ramp to stop the person's vehicle.

(2)  A person may not stop, stand, or park a vehicle on a runaway vehicle ramp or in the pathway of the runaway vehicle ramp.



Enacted by Chapter 233, 2013 General Session

